Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2906
Personal information; disclosure pursuant to federal law.

Personal information referred to in section 60-2905 shall be disclosed by the department or any officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department to carry out the purposes of Titles I and IV of the Anti-Car Theft Act of 1992, 15 U.S.C. 2021 et seq., the Automobile Information Disclosure Act, 15 U.S.C. 1231 et seq., the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., and 49 U.S.C. chapters 301, 305, and 321 to 331, as amended, and all federal regulations enacted or adopted to implement such federal laws.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 6.